New Jersey, session 221, S598.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A taxpayer who is on active duty as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States for the entire taxable year shall be allowed to deduct $250 from the taxpayers gross income for the taxable year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years commencing on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.